Louisiana, session 2026, HB189.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1666.1(A)(8) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1666.1. Extra compensation
A.
* * *
(8)(a) Every fire protection officer who is employed on a full-time basis by
the Lakefront Management Authority shall be paid by the state extra compensation
in the amount of six hundred dollars per month in addition to the compensation now
paid to him by his employer out of self-generated revenue attributable to the agency
employing the fire protection officers. To be eligible for the extra compensation,
each fire protection officer shall have completed one year of service, and any fire
protection officer hired after March 31, 1986, shall also have completed and passed
a certified fireman's training program equal to National Fire Protection Association
Standard 1001 Firefighter I and II Certification or a firemen's training program as
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-542 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 189
approved by the Louisiana State University Firemen Training Program in accordance
with R.S. 40:1541 et seq. and an airport rescue and firefighting certification.
(b) In the event that supplemental pay is increased as provided for in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, then the same amount of supplemental pay shall be
increased for the officers provided for in this Paragraph.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article X, Section 10(A)(1)(b) of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in
the Act which originated as House Bill No. ____ of this 2026 Regular Session of the
Legislature is adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.